California statutes. Penal Code
 plea in person or by attorney, or by the probation officer authorized in writing, provided that, in any subsequent prosecution of the defendant for any other offense, the prior conviction may be pleaded and proved and shall have the same effect as if relief had not been granted pursuant to this section.

(2) Dismissal of an accusatory pleading pursuant to this section does not permit a person to own, possess, or have in their custody or control a firearm or prevent their conviction under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 29800) of Division 9 of Title 4 of Part 6.

(3) Dismissal of an accusatory pleading underlying a conviction pursuant to this section does not permit a person prohibited from holding public office as a result of that conviction to hold public office.

(4) Dismissal of an accusation or information pursuant to this section does not release the defendant from the terms and conditions of an unexpired criminal protective order that has been issued by the court pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (i) of Section 136.2, subdivision (j) of Section 273.5, subdivision (l) of Section 368, or subdivision (k) of Section 646.9. These protective orders shall remain in full effect until expiration or until any further order by the court modifying or terminating the order, despite the dismissal of the underlying accusation or information.

(d) This section applies to a conviction specified in subdivision (a) or (b) that occurred before, as well as those occurring after, the effective date of this section, except that this section does not apply to
 the following:

(1) A misdemeanor violation of subdivision (c) of Section 288.

(2) A misdemeanor falling within the provisions of Section 42002.1 of the Vehicle Code.

(3) An infraction falling within the provisions of Section 42001 of the Vehicle Code.

(e) (1) A petition for relief under this section shall not be denied due to an unfulfilled order of restitution or restitution fine.

(2) An unfulfilled order of restitution or a restitution fine shall not be grounds for finding that a defendant did not fully comply with and perform the sentence of the court or a finding that a defendant
 has not lived an honest and upright life and has not conformed to and obeyed the laws of the land.

(3) When the court considers a petition for relief under this section, in its discretion and in the interest of justice, an unpaid order of restitution or restitution fine shall not be grounds for denial of the petition for relief. 

(f) A petition for dismissal of an infraction pursuant to this section shall be by written declaration, except upon a showing of compelling need. Dismissal of an infraction shall not be granted under this section unless the prosecuting attorney has been given at least 15 days’ notice of the petition for dismissal. It shall be presumed that the prosecuting
 attorney has received notice if proof of service is filed with the court.

(g) Any determination of amount made by a court under this section shall be valid only if either (1) made under procedures adopted by the Judicial Council or (2) approved by the Judicial Council.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 734, Sec. 4.   (SB 1106)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1203.4b.

(a) (1) If a defendant successfully participated in the California Conservation Camp program as an incarcerated individual hand crew member, pursuant to regulations adopted by the Secretary of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, or successfully participated as a member of a county incarcerated individual hand crew, as determined by the appropriate county authority, or successfully participated at an institutional firehouse, pursuant to regulations adopted by the Secretary of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, and has been released from custody, the defendant is eligible for relief pursuant to this section, except that incarcerated individuals who have been convicted of any of the following crimes are
 automatically ineligible for relief pursuant to this section:

(A) Murder.

(B) Kidnapping.

(C) Rape as defined in paragraph (2) or (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 261 or paragraph (1) or (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 262.

(D) Lewd acts on a child under 14 years of age, as defined in Section 288.

(E) A felony punishable by death or imprisonment in the state prison for life.

(F) A sex offense requiring registration pursuant to Section 290.

(G) Escape from a secure
 perimeter within the previous 10 years.

(H) Arson.

(2) Any denial of relief pursuant to this section shall be without prejudice.

(3) For purposes of this subdivision, successful participation in a conservation camp program or a program at an institutional firehouse and successful participation as a member of a county incarcerated individual hand crew, as determined by the appropriate county authority, means the incarcerated individual adequately performed their duties without any conduct that warranted removal from the program.

(b) (1) The defendant may file a petition for relief with the court in the county where the defendant was
 sentenced.

(2) (A) Upon the release from custody of the defendant, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall certify to the court in the county where the defendant was sentenced that the individual successfully participated in the California Conservation Camp program as an incarcerated individual hand crew member, or successfully participated at an institutional firehouse. The department shall provide a copy of this certification to the defendant upon their release and shall include information regarding the expungement process.
 The department may promulgate regulations to implement this process.

(B) Upon the release from custody of the defendant, a county authority shall certify to the court in the county where the defendant was sentenced that the individual successfully participated as a member of a county incarcerated individual hand crew. The county authority shall provide a copy of this certification to the defendant upon their release and shall include information regarding the expungement process. A county authority may promulgate rules to implement this process.

(3) If the secretary or appropriate county authority certifies to the court that the defendant successfully participated in the incarcerated individual conservation camp program, or institutional firehouse, or successfully participated as a member of a county incarcerated individual hand crew, as determined by the appropriate county authority, as specified in subdivision (a), and has been released from custody, the court, in its discretion and in the interests of justice, may issue an order pursuant to subdivision (c).

(4) To be eligible for relief pursuant to this section, the defendant is
 not required to complete the term of their probation, parole, or supervised release. Notwithstanding any other law, the court, in providing relief pursuant to this section, shall order early termination of probation, parole, or supervised release if the court determines that the defendant has not violated any terms or conditions of probation, parole, or supervised release prior to, and during the pendency of, the petition for relief pursuant to this section.

(5) All convictions for which the defendant is serving a sentence at the time the defendant successfully participates in a program as specified
 in subdivision (a) are subject to relief pursuant to this section, except that a defendant convicted of any offense listed in subparagraphs (A) to (H), inclusive, of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) is ineligible for relief pursuant to this section.

(6) (A) A defendant who is granted an order pursuant to this section shall not be required to disclose the conviction on an application for licensure by any state or local agency.

(B) This paragraph does not apply to an application for licensure by the Commission on
 Teacher Credentialing, a position as a peace officer, public office, or for contracting with the California State Lottery Commission.

(7) Notwithstanding Division 2.5 (commencing with Section 1797) of the Health and Safety Code or any other law and except as provided in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), a defendant’s arrest and conviction history at the time of their participation as an incarcerated individual hand crew member, as described in subdivision (a), or the acts underlying that arrest and conviction history, shall not form the basis for any state or local agency to deny
 a defendant who is granted an order pursuant to this section an emergency medical technician certification or any other license or certification necessary to work as a firefighter.

(c) (1) If the requirements of this section are met, the court, in its discretion and in the interest of justice, may permit the defendant to withdraw the plea of guilty or plea of nolo contendere and enter a plea of not guilty, or, if the defendant has been convicted after a plea of not guilty, the court shall set aside the verdict of guilty, and, in either case, the court shall thereupon dismiss the accusations or information against the defendant and the defendant shall thereafter be released from all penalties and disabilities resulting from the offense of which the defendant has been convicted, except as provided in Section 13555 of the Vehicle Code.

(2) The relief available pursuant to this section shall not be granted if the defendant is currently charged with the commission of any other offense.

(3) The defendant may make the application and change of plea in person or by attorney.

(4) (A) A petition for relief under this section shall not be denied due to an unfulfilled order of restitution or restitution fine.

(B) An unfulfilled order of restitution or restitution fine shall not be grounds for finding that a defendant did not successfully participate in the California Conservation Camp program as an incarcerated individual hand crew member or at an institutional firehouse, or that
 the defendant did not successfully participate as a member of a county incarcerated individual hand crew.

(C) When the court considers a petition for relief under this section, in its discretion and in the interest of justice, an unpaid order of restitution or restitution fine shall not be grounds for denial of the petition for relief.

(d) Relief granted pursuant to this section is subject to the following conditions:

(1) In any subsequent prosecution of the defendant for any other offense, the prior conviction may be pleaded and proved and shall have the same effect as if the accusation or information had not been dismissed.

(2) The order shall state, and
 the defendant shall be informed, that the order does not relieve the defendant of the obligation to disclose the conviction in response to any direct question contained in any questionnaire or application for licensure by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing, a peace officer, public office, or for contracting with the California State Lottery Commission.

(3) Dismissal of an accusation or information pursuant to this section does not permit a person to own, possess, or have in the person’s custody or control any firearm or prevent their conviction under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 29800) of Division 9 of Title 4 of Part 6.

(4) Dismissal of an accusation or information underlying a conviction pursuant to this section does not permit a person prohibited from holding public
 office as a result of that conviction to hold public office.

(5) Dismissal of an accusation or information pursuant to this section does not release the defendant from the terms and conditions of any unexpired criminal protective order that has been issued by the court pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (i) of Section 136.2, subdivision (j) of Section 273.5, subdivision (l) of Section 368, or subdivision (k) of Section 646.9. These protective orders shall remain in full effect until expiration or until any further order by the court modifying or terminating the order, despite the dismissal of the underlying accusation or information.

(e) (1) Relief shall not be granted under this section unless the prosecuting attorney has been given 15 days’ notice of the
 petition for relief.

(2) It shall be presumed that the prosecuting attorney has received notice if proof of service is filed with the court.

(f) If, after receiving notice pursuant to subdivision (e), the prosecuting attorney fails to appear and object to a petition for dismissal, the prosecuting attorney may not move to set aside or otherwise appeal the grant of that petition.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 746, Sec. 1.   (SB 245)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

1203.41.

(a) If a defendant is convicted of a felony, the court, in its discretion and in the interest of justice, may order the following relief, subject to the conditions of subdivision (b):

(1) The court may permit the defendant to withdraw their plea of guilty or plea of nolo contendere and enter a plea of not guilty, or, if the defendant has been convicted after a plea of not guilty, the court shall set aside the verdict of guilty, and, in either case, the court shall dismiss the accusations or information against the defendant and the defendant shall be released from all penalties and disabilities resulting from the offense of which they have been convicted, except as provided in Section 13555 of the Vehicle Code.

(2) The relief available under this section may be granted only after the lapse of one year following the defendant’s completion of the sentence, if the sentence was imposed pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (h) of Section 1170, or after the lapse of two years following the defendant’s completion of the sentence, if the sentence was imposed pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (h) of Section 1170 or if the defendant was sentenced to the state prison.

(3) The relief available under this section may be granted only if the defendant is not on parole or under supervision pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (h) of Section 1170, and is not serving a sentence for, on probation for, or charged with the commission of, an offense.

(4) The defendant shall be
 informed, either orally or in writing, of the provisions of this section and of their right, if any, to petition for a certificate of rehabilitation and pardon at the time of sentencing.

(5) The defendant may make the application and change of plea in person or by attorney, or by a probation officer authorized in writing.

(6) If the defendant seeks relief under this section for a felony that resulted in a sentence to the state prison, the relief available under this section may only be granted if that felony did not result in a requirement to register as a sex offender pursuant to Chapter 5.5 (commencing with Section 290) of Title 9 of Part 1.

(b) Relief granted pursuant to subdivision (a) is subject to all of the following conditions:

(1) In any
 subsequent prosecution of the defendant for any other offense, the prior conviction may be pleaded and proved and shall have the same effect as if the accusation or information had not been dismissed.

(2) The order shall state, and the defendant shall be informed, that the order does not relieve them of the obligation to disclose the conviction in response to a direct question contained in a questionnaire or application for public office, for licensure by a state or local agency or by a federally recognized tribe, for enrollment as a provider of in-home supportive services and waiver personal care services pursuant to Article 7 (commencing with Section 12300) of Chapter 3 of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code or pursuant to Section 14132.95, 14132.952, 14132.956, or 14132.97 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, or for contracting with the California State Lottery Commission.

(3) Dismissal of an accusation or information pursuant to this section does not permit a person to own, possess, or have in their custody or control a firearm or prevent their conviction under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 29800) of Division 9 of Title 4 of Part 6.

(4) Dismissal of an accusation or information underlying a conviction pursuant to this section does not permit a person prohibited from holding public office as a result of that conviction to hold public office.

(c) This section applies to any conviction specified in subdivision (a) that occurred before, on, or after January 1, 2021.

(d) When the court considers a petition for relief under this section, in its discretion and in the interest of justice, an unpaid order of restitution or
 restitution fine shall not be grounds for denial of the petition for relief.

(e) (1) Relief shall not be granted under this section unless the prosecuting attorney has been given 15 days’ notice of the petition for relief. The probation officer shall notify the prosecuting
 attorney when a petition is filed, pursuant to this section.

(2) It shall be presumed that the prosecuting attorney has received notice if proof of service is filed with the court.

(f) If, after receiving notice pursuant to subdivision (e), the prosecuting attorney fails to appear and object to a petition for dismissal, the prosecuting attorney shall not move to set aside or otherwise appeal the grant of that
 petition.

(g) Relief granted pursuant to this section does not release the defendant from the terms and conditions of any unexpired criminal protective orders that have been issued by the court pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (i) of Section 136.2, subdivision (j) of Section 273.5, subdivision (l) of Section 368, or subdivision (k) of Section 646.9. These protective orders shall remain in full effect until expiration or until any further order by the court modifying or terminating the order, despite the dismissal of the underlying accusation or information.

(h) Relief granted pursuant to this section does not affect the authority to receive, or take adverse action based on, criminal history information, including the authority to receive certified court records received or evaluated pursuant to Section 1522, 1568.09, 1569.17, or 1596.871 of the Health and Safety Code, or pursuant to any statutory or regulatory provisions that incorporate the criteria of those sections. Relief granted pursuant to this section does not make eligible a person who is otherwise ineligible under state or federal law or regulation to provide, or receive payment for providing, in-home supportive services and waiver personal care services pursuant to Article 7 (commencing with Section 12300) of Chapter 3 of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, or pursuant to Section 14132.95, 14132.952, 14132.956,
 or 14132.97 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 47, Sec. 8.   (AB 134)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1203.42.

(a) If a defendant was sentenced prior to the implementation of the 2011 Realignment Legislation for a crime for which the defendant would otherwise have been eligible for sentencing pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170, the court, in its discretion and in the interest of justice, may order the following relief, subject to the conditions of subdivision (b):

(1) The court may permit the defendant to withdraw their plea of guilty or plea of nolo contendere and enter a plea of not guilty, or, if the defendant has been convicted after a plea of not guilty, the court shall set aside the verdict of guilty, and, in either case, the court shall thereupon dismiss the accusations or information against the defendant and the defendant shall be released from all
 penalties and disabilities resulting from the offense of which they have been convicted, except as provided in Section 13555 of the Vehicle Code.

(2) The relief available under this section may be granted only after the lapse of two years following the defendant’s completion of the sentence.

(3) The relief available under this section may be granted only if the defendant is not under supervised release, and is not serving a sentence for, on probation for, or charged with the commission of, an offense.

(4) The defendant may make the application and change of plea in person or by attorney, or by a probation officer authorized in writing.

(b) Relief granted pursuant to subdivision (a) is subject to the following conditions:

(1) In a subsequent prosecution of the defendant for any other offense, the prior conviction may be pleaded and proved and shall have the same effect as if the accusation or information had not been dismissed.

(2) The order shall state, and the defendant shall be informed, that the order does not relieve the defendant of the obligation to disclose the conviction in response to a direct question contained in a questionnaire or application for public office, for licensure by a state or local agency, or for contracting with the California State Lottery Commission.

(3) Dismissal of an accusation or information pursuant to this section does not permit a person to own, possess, or have in their custody or control a firearm or prevent a conviction under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 29800) of Division 9 of Title 4 of Part
 6.

(4) Dismissal of an accusation or information underlying a conviction pursuant to this section does not permit a person prohibited from holding public office as a result of that conviction to hold public office.

(c) When the court considers a petition for relief under this section, in its discretion and in the interest of justice, an unpaid order of restitution or restitution fine shall not be grounds for denial of the petition for relief.

(d) (1)   Relief shall not be granted under this section unless the prosecuting attorney has been given 15 days’ notice of the petition for relief. The probation officer shall notify the prosecuting attorney when a petition is filed, pursuant to this section.

(2) It shall be presumed that the prosecuting attorney has received notice if proof of service is filed with the court.

(e) If, after receiving notice pursuant to subdivision (d), the prosecuting attorney fails to appear and object to a petition for dismissal, the prosecuting attorney may not move to set aside or otherwise appeal the grant of that petition.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 47, Sec. 9.   (AB 134)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1203.425.

(a) (1) (A) Commencing October 1, 2024, and subject to an appropriation in the annual Budget Act, on a monthly basis, the Department of Justice shall review the records in the statewide criminal justice databases, and based on information in the state summary criminal history repository and the Supervised Release File, shall identify persons with convictions that meet the criteria set forth in subparagraph (B) and are eligible for automatic conviction record relief.

(B) A person is eligible for automatic
 conviction relief pursuant to this section if they meet all of the following conditions:

(i) The person is not required to register pursuant to the Sex Offender Registration Act.

(ii) The person does not have an active record for local, state, or federal supervision in the Supervised Release File.

(iii) Based upon the information available in the department’s record, including disposition dates and sentencing terms, it does not appear that the person is currently serving a sentence for an offense and there is no indication of pending criminal charges.

(iv) The conviction meets either of the following criteria:

(I) The conviction occurred on or after January 1, 1973, and meets either of the
 following criteria:

(ia) The defendant was sentenced to probation and, based upon the disposition date and the term of probation specified in the department’s records, appears to have completed their term of probation without revocation.

(ib) The defendant was convicted of an infraction or misdemeanor other than one eligible under sub-subclause (ia), and, based upon the disposition date and the term specified in the department’s records, the defendant appears to have completed their sentence, and at least one calendar year has elapsed since the date of judgment.

(II) The conviction occurred on or after January 1, 1973,
 the defendant was convicted of a felony other than one for which the defendant completed probation without revocation, and based upon the disposition date and the sentence specified in the department’s records, appears to have completed all terms of incarceration, probation, mandatory supervision, postrelease community supervision, and parole, and a period of four years has elapsed since the date on which the defendant completed probation or supervision for that conviction and during which the defendant was not convicted of a new felony offense. This subclause does not apply to a conviction of a serious felony defined in subdivision (c) of Section 1192.7, a violent felony as defined in Section 667.5, or a felony offense requiring registration pursuant to Chapter 5.5 (commencing with Section 290) of Title 9 of Part 1.

(2) (A) Except as specified in subdivision (b), the department shall grant relief,
 including dismissal of a conviction, to a person identified pursuant to paragraph (1) without requiring a petition or motion by a party for that relief if the relevant information is present in the department’s electronic records.

(B) The state summary criminal history information shall include, directly next to or below the entry or entries regarding the person’s criminal record, a note stating “relief granted,” listing the date that the department granted relief and this section. This note shall be included in all statewide criminal databases with a record of the conviction.

(C) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (4) and in Section 13555 of the Vehicle Code, a person granted conviction relief pursuant to this section shall be released from all penalties and disabilities resulting from the offense of which the person has been convicted.

(3) (A) Commencing July 1, 2022, and subject to an appropriation in the annual Budget Act, on a monthly basis, the department shall electronically submit a notice to the superior court having jurisdiction over the criminal case, informing the court of all cases for which a complaint was filed in that jurisdiction and for which relief was granted pursuant to this section. Commencing on January 1, 2023, for any record retained by the court pursuant to Section 68152 of the Government Code, except as provided in paragraph (4), the court shall not disclose information concerning a conviction granted relief pursuant to this section or Section 1203.4, 1203.4a, 1203.41, or 1203.42, to any person or entity, in any format, except to the person whose conviction was granted relief or a criminal justice agency, as defined in Section 851.92.

(B) If probation is transferred
 pursuant to Section 1203.9, the department shall electronically submit a notice as provided in subparagraph (A) to both the transferring court and any subsequent receiving court. The electronic notice shall be in a mutually agreed upon format.

(C) If a receiving court reduces a felony to a misdemeanor pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 17, or dismisses a conviction pursuant to law, including, but not limited to, Section 1203.4, 1203.4a, 1203.41, 1203.42, 1203.43, or 1203.49, it shall furnish a disposition report to the department with the original case number and CII number from the transferring court. The department shall electronically submit a notice to the superior court that sentenced the defendant. If probation is transferred multiple times, the department shall electronically submit a notice to all other involved courts. The electronic notice shall be in a mutually agreed upon format.

(D) If a court receives notification from the department pursuant to subparagraph (B), the court shall update its records to reflect the reduction or dismissal. If a court receives notification that a case was dismissed pursuant to this section or Section 1203.4, 1203.4a, 1203.41, or 1203.42, the court shall update its records to reflect the dismissal and shall not disclose information concerning a conviction granted relief to any person or entity, in any format, except to the person whose conviction was granted relief or a criminal justice agency, as defined in Section 851.92.

(4) Relief granted pursuant to this section is subject to the following conditions:

(A) Relief granted pursuant to this section does not relieve a person of the obligation to disclose a criminal conviction in response to a direct question contained
 in a questionnaire or application for employment as a peace officer, as defined in Section 830.

(B) Relief granted pursuant to this section does not relieve a person of the obligation to disclose the conviction in response to a direct question contained in a questionnaire or application for public office, for enrollment as a provider of in-home supportive services and waiver personal care services pursuant to Article 7 (commencing with Section 12300) of Chapter 3 of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code or pursuant to Section 14132.95, 14132.952, 14132.956, or 14132.97 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, or for contracting with the California State Lottery Commission.

(C) Relief granted pursuant to this section has no effect on the ability of a criminal justice agency, as defined in Section 851.92, to access and use records that are granted relief to the same
 extent that would have been permitted for a criminal justice agency had relief not been granted.

(D) Relief granted pursuant to this section does not limit the jurisdiction of the court over a subsequently filed motion to amend the record, petition or motion for postconviction relief, or collateral attack on a conviction for which relief has been granted pursuant to this section.

(E) Relief granted pursuant to this section does not affect a person’s authorization to own, possess, or have in the person’s custody or control a firearm, or the person’s susceptibility to conviction under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 29800) of Division 9 of Title 4 of Part 6, if the criminal conviction would otherwise affect this authorization or susceptibility.

(F) Relief granted pursuant to this section does not affect a
 prohibition from holding public office that would otherwise apply under law as a result of the criminal conviction.

(G) Relief granted pursuant to this section does not release a person from the terms and conditions of any unexpired criminal protective order that has been issued by the court pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (i) of Section 136.2, subdivision (j) of Section 273.5, subdivision (l) of Section 368, or subdivision (k) of Section 646.9. These protective orders shall remain in full effect until expiration or until any further order by the court modifying or terminating the order, despite the dismissal of the underlying conviction.

(H) Relief granted pursuant to this section does not affect the authority to receive, or take adverse action based on, criminal history information, including the authority to receive certified court records received or evaluated
 pursuant to Section 1522, 1568.09, 1569.17, or 1596.871 of the Health and Safety Code, or pursuant to any statutory or regulatory provisions that incorporate the criteria of those sections.

(I) Relief granted pursuant to this section does not make eligible a person who is otherwise ineligible under state or federal law or regulation to provide, or receive payment for providing, in-home supportive services and waiver personal care services pursuant to Article 7 (commencing with Section 12300) of Chapter 3 of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, or pursuant to Section 14132.95, 14132.952, 14132.956, or 14132.97 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(J) In a subsequent prosecution of the defendant for any other offense, the prior conviction may be pleaded and proved and shall have the same effect as if the relief had not been granted.

(K) (i) Relief granted pursuant to this section does not affect the authority to receive, or take adverse action based on, criminal history information, including the authority to receive certified court records received or evaluated pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 44000) of Chapter 1, Article 3 (commencing with Section 44240) and Article 8 (commencing with Section 44330) of Chapter 2, Article 1 (commencing with Section 44420) of Chapter 3, Article 3 (commencing with Section 44930) of Chapter 4, Article 1 (commencing with Section 45100) and Article 6 (commencing with Section 45240) of Chapter 5, of Part 25 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Education Code, or pursuant to any statutory or regulatory provisions that relate to, incorporate, expand upon, or interpret the authority of those provisions.

(ii) Notwithstanding clause (i) or any other law,
 information for a conviction for a controlled substance offense listed in Section 11350 or 11377, or former Section 11500 or 11500.5, of the Health and Safety Code that is more than five years old, for which relief is granted pursuant to this section, shall not be disclosed.

(L) Relief granted pursuant to this section does not release the defendant from the terms and conditions of any unexpired criminal protective orders that have been issued by the court pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (i) of Section 136.2, subdivision (j) of Section 273.5, subdivision (l) of Section 368, or subdivision (k) of Section 646.9. These protective orders shall remain in full effect until expiration or until any further order by the court modifying or terminating the order, despite the dismissal of the underlying accusation or information.

(5) This section does not limit petitions, motions, or
 orders for relief in a criminal case, as required or authorized by any other law, including, but not limited to, Sections 1016.5, 1203.4, 1203.4a, 1203.4b, 1203.41, 1203.42, 1203.49, and 1473.7. This section does not limit petitions for a certificate of rehabilitation or pardon pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 4852.01) of Title 6 of Part 3.

(6) Commencing July 1, 2022, and subject to an appropriation in the annual Budget Act, the department shall annually publish statistics for each county regarding the total number of convictions granted relief pursuant to this section and the total number of convictions prohibited from automatic relief pursuant to subdivision (b), on the OpenJustice Web portal, as defined in Section 13010.

(7) Upon request from the subject of the
 record for a copy of their state summary criminal history information record made in accordance with Sections 11122 and 11123, the department shall furnish a copy of the record to the subject of the record or to an individual designated by them in accordance with Section 11124 to provide confirmation that relief was granted pursuant to this section.

(b) (1) The prosecuting attorney or probation department may, no later than 90 calendar days before the date of a person’s eligibility for relief pursuant to this section, file a petition to prohibit the department from granting automatic relief pursuant to this section, based on a showing that granting that relief would pose a substantial threat to the public safety. If probation was transferred pursuant to Section 1203.9, the prosecuting attorney or probation department in either the receiving county or the transferring county shall
 file the petition in the county of current jurisdiction.

(2) The court shall give notice to the defendant and conduct a hearing on the petition within 45 days after the petition is filed.

(3) At a hearing on the petition pursuant to this subdivision, the defendant, the probation department, the prosecuting attorney, and the arresting agency, through the prosecuting attorney, may present evidence to the court. Notwithstanding Sections 1538.5 and 1539, the hearing may be heard and determined upon declarations, affidavits, police investigative reports, copies of state summary criminal history information and local summary criminal history information, or any other evidence submitted by the parties that is material, reliable, and relevant.

(4) The prosecutor or probation department has the initial burden of proof to show
 that granting conviction relief would pose a substantial threat to the public safety. In determining whether granting relief would pose a substantial threat to the public safety, the court may consider any relevant factors, including, but not limited to, either of the following:

(A) Declarations or evidence regarding the offense for which a grant of relief is being contested.

(B) The defendant’s record of arrests and convictions.

(5) If the court finds that the prosecutor or probation department has satisfied the burden of proof, the burden shifts to the defendant to show that the hardship of not obtaining relief outweighs the threat to the public safety of providing relief. In determining whether the defendant’s hardship outweighs the threat to the public safety, the court may consider any relevant factors,
 including, but not limited to, either of the following:

(A) The hardship to the defendant that has been caused by the conviction and that would be caused if relief is not granted.

(B) Declarations or evidence regarding the defendant’s good character.

(6) If the court grants a petition pursuant to this subdivision, the court shall furnish a disposition report to the Department of Justice pursuant to Section 13151, stating that relief pursuant to this section was denied, and the department shall not grant relief pursuant to this section. If probation was transferred pursuant to Section 1203.9, the department shall electronically submit a notice to the transferring court, and, if probation was transferred multiple times, to all other involved courts.

(7) A
 person denied relief pursuant to this section may continue to be eligible for relief pursuant to law, including, but not limited to, Section 1203.4, 1203.4a, 1203.4b, or 1203.41. If the court subsequently grants relief pursuant to one of those sections, the court shall furnish a disposition report to the Department of Justice pursuant to Section 13151, stating that relief was granted pursuant to the applicable section, and the department shall grant relief pursuant to that section. If probation was transferred pursuant to Section 1203.9, the department shall electronically submit a notice that relief was granted pursuant to the applicable section to the transferring court and, if probation was transferred multiple times, to all other involved courts.

(c) At the time of sentencing, the court shall advise a defendant, either orally or in writing, of the provisions of this section and of the defendant’s right, if any, to petition for a certificate
 of rehabilitation and pardon.

(d) This section shall become operative on October 1, 2024.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 444, Sec. 1) by Stats. 2024, Ch. 49, Sec. 5.   (AB 168)   Effective July 2, 2024.   Operative October 1, 2024, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

1203.43.
